Nebraska, session 109, LB1147.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1147 LB1147
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section, impoundment of funds
means, when through action or inaction, funds appropriated by the
Legislature are delayed or withheld by the Governor or by any official or
employee of the executive branch of state government at the direction of
the Governor.
(2) The Auditor of Public Accounts shall investigate any complaints
of impoundment of funds filed pursuant to subsection (3) of this section
and submit a quarterly report electronically to the Clerk of the
Legislature relating to any impoundment of funds. Such report shall
include the following information to the extent known:
(a) A list of any impoundment of funds, including the amount of the
funds impounded;
(b) The date any funds were impounded and the date on which any
funds were ordered to be impounded;
(c) The period of time for any impoundment of funds and if it
appears to be a temporary deferral of funds or a permanent cancellation
of such spending of such funds;
(d) The department or establishment of the government to which the
funds would have been available for obligation except for such
impoundment;
(e) The reason or explanation for the impoundment of funds;
(f) The estimated fiscal, economic, and budgetary effect of the
impoundment of funds; and
(g) Any other information the Auditor of Public Accounts considers
pertinent to the report on any impoundment of funds.
(3) A complaint of impoundment of funds may be filed with the
Auditor of Public Accounts by any member of the Legislature, state
agency, or eligible recipient of public funds approved by the
Legislature.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-